Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.023

Contracts subject to requirements established under office of minority and women's business enterprises.

All contracts entered into under this chapter by institutions of higher education on or after September 1, 1983, are subject to the requirements established under chapter 39.19 RCW.

[ 1983 c 120 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Applicability—Severability—Conflict with federal requirements—1983 c 120: See RCW 39.19.910, 39.19.920.